District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.221

Definitions.

For the purposes of this part, the term:

(1)

“Fund” means the Innovation Fund established in § 1-325.222.

(2)

“Grant-managing entity” means the Community Foundation for the National Capital Region pursuant to § 1-325.225.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 1012, 60 DCR 12472
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1012 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1012 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 1011 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle B of Title I of the act may be cited as the “Innovation Fund Establishment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.